Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1914.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "unconscionably excessive" in section 3 of the act of October 31, 2006 (P.L.1210, No.133), known as the Price Gouging Act, is amended and the section is amended by adding a definition to read:Section 3. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Cost." Any cost directly or indirectly related to the sale of a consumer good or service or the operation of a seller's business. The term includes replacement costs, credit card costs, taxes and transportation costs . 12345678910111213141516171819 * * *["Unconscionably excessive." A price is unconscionably excessive when the amount charged represents a gross disparity between the price of the consumer goods or services and the price at which the consumer goods or services were sold or offered for sale within the chain of distribution in the usual course of business seven days immediately prior to the state of disaster emergency.]Section 2. Sections 4(a), (b), (c) and (d) and 5(a) of the act are amended to read:Section 4. Price gouging prohibited.(a) Prohibition.--[During and within 30 days of the termination] On the declaration of a state of disaster emergency [declared] by the Governor pursuant to the provisions of 35 Pa.C.S. § 7301(c) (relating to general authority of Governor), the Governor may, by expressly stating in a declaration of a state of disaster emergency that the provisions of this act are applicable , impose a price restriction under this section on the sale of consumer goods or services necessary for use or consumption in the affected geographic area as a direct result of the state of disaster emergency for a period of 15 days. The price restriction may be renewed for up to three additional 15-day periods as may be necessary. During the period the price restriction is in effect, it shall be a violation of this act for any party within the chain of distribution of consumer goods or services or both to sell or offer to sell the affected goods or services within the geographic region that is the subject of the declared emergency for an amount which represents an unconscionably excessive price.(b) [Evidence of unconscionably] Unconscionably excessive 20250HB1914PN2395 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 price.--[It is prima facie evidence that a price is unconscionably excessive if, during and within 30 days of the termination of a state of disaster emergency, parties within the chain of distribution charge a price that exceeds an amount equal to or in excess of 20% of the average price at which the same or similar consumer goods or services were obtainable in the affected area during the last seven days immediately prior to the declared state of emergency.](1) Whether a price is an unconscionably excessive price is a question of law. The court shall consider all relevant factors, including whether there is a gross disparity between the seller's price immediately before the price restriction under subsection (a) was imposed and the seller's price following the declaration of a state of disaster emergency and whether the seller's price substantially exceeds those prevailing on the date and in the locality in question. (2) A price is not an unconscionably excessive price if the price:(i) is 10% or less above the seller's price immediately before the price restriction under subsection (a) was imposed;(ii) is 10% or less above the sum of the seller's cost and normal markup for the good or service; (iii) is consistent with price fluctuations in applicable commodity, regional, national or international markets or with seasonal price fluctuations; or(iv) is a contract price, or the result of a price formula, including a price formula used in connection with the reservation of goods or services for future use, established before the price restriction under subsection 20250HB1914PN2395 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) was imposed.(3) It is prima facie evidence that a price is an unconscionably excessive price if none of the factors in paragraph (2) applies to that price.(c) Nonapplicability.--[(1) The provisions of this section shall not apply if the increase in price is due to a disparity that is substantially attributable to additional costs that arose within the chain of distribution in connection with the sale of consumer goods or services, including replacement costs, credit card costs, taxes and transportation costs.(2)] The provisions of this act shall not apply to the sale of goods or services sold by a person pursuant to a tariff or rate approved by a Federal or Commonwealth agency with power and authority over sales of such goods or services.(d) Price reduction.--A person selling consumer goods or services who receives any price reduction, after an increase in his cost which is substantially attributable to costs that arose within the chain of distribution [as set forth in subsection (c)], may rebut an allegation of selling at an unconscionably excessive price if he reduces the price by a like amount within a reasonable period, not to exceed seven days, of acquiring the consumer good or service at such reduced price.* * *Section 5. Investigation.(a) Authority.--The Bureau of Consumer Protection in the Office of Attorney General shall investigate any complaints received concerning violations of this act. If, after investigating any complaint, the Attorney General finds that 20250HB1914PN2395 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 there has been a violation of this act, the Attorney General may bring an action to impose a civil penalty up to $10,000 for each willful violation, with an aggregate total that may not exceed $25,000 for a 24-hour period against a seller, and to seek other relief, including injunctive relief, restitution and costs under the act of December 17, 1968 (P.L.1224, No.387), known as the Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Law. The civil penalty under this subsection shall be the sole penalty for conduct in violation of this act. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to create or imply a private cause of action for a violation of this act.* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1914PN2395 - 5 - 12345678910111213